Indiana, session 2026, HB1130.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 7.1-2-3-33, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 33. The commission is authorized to:
(1) investigate a violation of; and
(2) enforce a penalty for a violation of;
IC 7.1-8, IC 35-46-1-10, IC 35-46-1-10.2, IC 35-46-1-11,
IC 35-46-1-11.2, IC 35-46-1-11.4, IC 35-46-1-11.5, IC 35-46-1-11.7,
or IC 35-46-1-11.8.
SECTION 2. IC 7.1-5-7-18 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) A law enforcement officer vested with full
police powers and duties may engage an individual who is:
(1) at least sixteen (16) years of age; and
(2) less than twenty-one (21) years of age;
to receive or purchase craft hemp, a product that contains low
THC hemp extract, or a product that contains craft hemp, as part
of an enforcement action under this article.
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(b) The initial or contemporaneous receipt or purchase of craft
hemp, a product that contains low THC hemp extract, or a product
that contains craft hemp may only:
(1) occur under the direction of a law enforcement officer
vested with full police powers and duties; and
(2) be part of an enforcement action.
SECTION 3. IC 7.1-5-10-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.159-2014,
SECTION 80, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) A person who, knowing that another
person is intoxicated, sells, barters, delivers, or gives away an alcoholic
beverage or a product containing THC (tetrahydrocannabinol) to
the intoxicated person commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(b) In any civil proceeding in which damages are sought from a
permittee or a permittee's agent for the refusal to serve a person an
alcoholic beverage or a product containing THC
(tetrahydrocannabinol), it is a complete defense if the permittee or
agent reasonably believed that the person was intoxicated or was
otherwise not entitled to be served an alcoholic beverage or a product
containing THC (tetrahydrocannabinol).
(c) After charges have been filed against a person for a violation of
subsection (a), the prosecuting attorney shall notify the commission of
the charges filed.
SECTION 4. IC 7.1-5-10-15.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15.5. (a) As used in this
section, "furnish" includes barter, deliver, sell, exchange, provide, or
give away.
(b) A person who furnishes an alcoholic beverage or a product
containing THC (tetrahydrocannabinol) to a person is not liable in
a civil action for damages caused by the impairment or intoxication of
the person who was furnished the alcoholic beverage or product
containing THC (tetrahydrocannabinol) unless:
(1) the person furnishing the alcoholic beverage or product
containing THC (tetrahydrocannabinol) had actual knowledge
that the person to whom the alcoholic beverage or product
containing THC (tetrahydrocannabinol) was furnished was
visibly intoxicated at the time the alcoholic beverage or product
containing THC (tetrahydrocannabinol) was furnished; and
(2) the intoxication of the person to whom the alcoholic beverage
or product containing THC (tetrahydrocannabinol) was
furnished was a proximate cause of the death, injury, or damage
alleged in the complaint.
(c) If a person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age suffers
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


injury or death proximately caused by the person's voluntary
intoxication, the:
(1) person;
(2) person's dependents;
(3) person's personal representative; or
(4) person's heirs;
may not assert a claim for damages for personal injury or death against
a person who furnished an alcoholic beverage or a product containing
THC (tetrahydrocannabinol) that contributed to the person's
intoxication, unless subsections (b)(1) and (b)(2) apply.
SECTION 5. IC 7.1-7-2-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) "E-liquid" means a substance that:
(1) may or may not contain nicotine; and
(2) is intended to be vaporized and inhaled using a vapor product.
(b) This subsection applies before July 1, 2026. The term does
not include a craft hemp flower product as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-68.9.
(c) This subsection applies after June 30, 2026. The term does
not include:
(1) a craft hemp flower product as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-68.9; and
(2) low THC hemp extract as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-27.
SECTION 6. IC 7.1-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS A
NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 8. CRAFT HEMP
Chapter 0.5. Application
Sec. 1. Notwithstanding any other law, a retailer, distributor,
manufacturer, or out-of-state supplier who was in operation before
January 1, 2026, may continue to operate without a permit issued
under this article until December 31, 2026, if the retailer,
distributor, or manufacturer applies for a permit to sell, distribute,
or manufacture craft hemp by December 31, 2026.
Chapter 1. Definitions
Sec. 1. As used in this article, "convenience store" means a retail
establishment that:
(1) has a retail premises that is less than three thousand five
hundred (3,500) square feet; and
(2) sells prepackaged food, snacks, and beverages, and that
may sell gasoline or automotive products.
The term does not include a drug store.
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


Sec. 2. As used in this article, "craft hemp" means a craft hemp
flower product, craft hemp flower, and low THC hemp extract.
Sec. 3. As used in this article, "craft hemp flower" has the
meaning set forth in IC 35-31.5-2-68.8.
Sec. 4. As used in this article, "craft hemp flower product" has
the meaning set forth in IC 35-31.5-2-68.9.
Sec. 5. As used in this article, "drug store" has the meaning set
forth in IC 7.1-1-3-15.
Sec. 6. As used in this article, "low THC hemp extract" has the
meaning set forth in IC 35-48-1.1-27.
Sec. 7. As used in this article, "restricted grocery store" means
a retail establishment that:
(1) is primarily engaged in the retail sale of a general food line
that includes:
(A) canned and frozen foods;
(B) fresh fruits and vegetables;
(C) fresh and prepared meat, fish, and poultry;
(D) groceries or gourmet foods in combination with
general lines of new merchandise, including apparel,
furniture, and appliances; or
(E) specialty or gourmet foods; and
(2) has a retail premises that is at least three thousand five
hundred (3,500) square feet.
Chapter 1.5. Craft Hemp Permits
Sec. 1. (a) The holder of a permit issued under this article shall
keep and maintain all invoices of craft hemp that is purchased or
acquired. Each invoice must contain the following information:
(1) The permit numbers of each party in a transaction.
(2) The transaction date or dates.
(3) The expiration date or dates of each permit holder's
permit or permits.
(4) Each permit holder's address.
(b) The holder of a permit issued under this article must:
(1) keep the invoices described in subsection (a) on the permit
holder's premises; and
(2) make the invoices described in subsection (a) available for
inspection by the commission.
Chapter 2. Craft Hemp Retail Permits
Sec. 1. (a) A person may not sell or otherwise distribute in
exchange for consideration craft hemp directly to a consumer for
consumption off the permitted premises without a valid craft hemp
retail permit issued by the commission.
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(b) The commission may issue not more than twenty thousand
(20,000) craft hemp retail permits.
(c) The commission may issue a restricted craft hemp retail
permit to a drug store or restricted grocery store authorizing the
sale of one (1) or more of the following:
(1) A product containing not more than three-tenths of one
percent (0.3%) total THC (tetrahydrocannabinol).
(2) A beverage described in IC 35-31.5-2-68.9(a)(4)(C).
(d) The commission may issue a craft hemp retail permit to a
convenience store.
(e) A craft hemp retail permit may be issued only to a person
who owns or operates premises consisting of a permanent building
or structure where the craft hemp is sold or distributed.
(f) A craft hemp retail permit holder may only purchase craft
hemp from a craft hemp manufacturer permit holder or a craft
hemp distributor permit holder.
(g) A person who is a craft hemp retail permit holder and a
retail alcoholic beverage permit holder may serve craft hemp
beverages in the original container for consumption on the
permitted premises.
Sec. 2. (a) A person who desires a craft hemp retail permit
under this chapter must provide the following to the commission:
(1) The applicant's name and mailing address and the address
of the premises for which the permit is being issued.
(2) A fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each retail
location.
(3) The name under which the applicant transacts or intends
to transact business.
(4) The address of the applicant's principal place of business
or headquarters, if any.
(5) The statement required under section 4 of this chapter.
(6) If the applicant is applying for a new permit under section
6 of this chapter, a copy of each of the following:
(A) If the new ownership of the business is a business
entity, the articles of incorporation, articles of
organization, or any other formation documents of the
business entity.
(B) If the new ownership of the business is an individual,
either:
(i) the sales or purchase agreement; or
(ii) an affidavit signed by the applicant concerning the
sale or purchase, on a form prescribed by the
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


commission, that includes the name and address of the
seller and purchaser.
(C) The permit held by the previous ownership of the
business.
(b) A separate craft hemp retail permit is required for each
location where the craft hemp is sold or distributed. A retail
establishment may not hold more than one (1) active craft hemp
retail permit for a retail location at any time.
(c) A craft hemp retail permit holder shall conspicuously display
the holder's permit on the holder's premises where the craft hemp
is sold or distributed.
(d) Any intentional misstatement or suppression of a material
fact in an application filed under this section constitutes grounds
for denial of the craft hemp retail permit.
(e) A craft hemp retail permit may be issued only to a person
who meets the following requirements:
(1) If the person is an individual, the person must be at least
twenty-one (21) years of age.
(2) The person must be authorized to do business in Indiana.
(3) The person has not had an interest in a permit revoked by
the commission for that business location within the preceding
one (1) year.
(f) The fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the
enforcement and administration fund under IC 7.1-4-10.
Sec. 3. (a) Subject to available resources, the commission shall
not issue a craft hemp retail permit, except as otherwise authorized
in this title and subject to the other restrictions contained in this
title, to the following persons:
(1) A person who does not have lawful status (as defined in
IC 9-13-2-92.3).
(2) A person who has been convicted within five (5) years
before the date of application of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1)
year;
(B) a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony;
or
(C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty
equal to the penalty for an Indiana Level 1, Level 2, Level
3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony.
However, this subdivision does not apply to a conviction that
has been expunged under IC 35-38-9.
(3) A person who does not meet at least one (1) of the
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


following descriptions:
(A) The person owns the premises to which the permit will
be applicable.
(B) The person has a valid lease on the premises:
(i) at the time of the application for a permit; and
(ii) for the duration of the period in which the person
sells or distributes in the manner described in section 1
of this chapter.
(C) The person has a franchise agreement with a
franchisor:
(i) that owns the premises to which the permit will be
applicable; or
(ii) that has a bona fide lease on the premises for the full
period for which the permit is to be issued.
(4) A person whose place of business is conducted by a
manager or agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the
same qualifications required for the issuance of a craft hemp
retail permit to the person.
(5) A minor.
(6) A person non compos mentis.
(7) A person who has held a permit under this article or a
permit under this title and who has had that permit under this
article or this title, as applicable, revoked within one (1) year
prior to the date of application for a craft hemp retail permit.
(8) A person who has made an application for a permit under
this article or a permit of any type under this title that has
been denied less than one (1) year prior to the person's
application for a craft hemp retail permit unless the first
application was denied by reason of a procedural or technical
defect.
(b) Subsection (a)(5) does not prevent a minor from being a
stockholder in a corporation.
Sec. 4. An application for a craft hemp retail permit must
contain the express statement of the applicant that the applicant
consents for the duration of the permit term (if the commission
issues the permit to the applicant) to the entrance, inspection, and
search by an enforcement officer, without a warrant or other
process, of the applicant's retail premises to determine whether the
applicant is complying with the provisions of this title. The consent
required by this section is renewed and continued by the retention
of a permit or the permit's use by the applicant or the applicant's
agents.
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


Sec. 5. (a) A craft hemp retail permit issued by the commission
under this chapter must contain the following information:
(1) The permit number.
(2) The permit holder's name.
(3) The permanent location of the business for which the
permit is issued.
(4) The expiration date of the permit.
(b) A craft hemp retail permit is:
(1) valid for two (2) years after the date of issuance, unless the
commission suspends the permit; and
(2) nontransferable.
(c) A craft hemp retail permit may be renewed. The fee for
renewing a permit is one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each retail
location.
Sec. 6. If the majority of the ownership of a business that is a
craft hemp retail permit holder is sold or transferred:
(1) the new ownership of the business must apply for a new
permit under section 2 of this chapter; and
(2) the permit and the permit number held by the previous
ownership of the business are void ninety (90) days after the
date of the sale or transfer of the ownership of the business.
Sec. 7. The commission may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
establish procedures for the issuance, renewal, and reinstatement
of a craft hemp retail permit.
Sec. 8. (a) Subject to subsection (b), the commission may
suspend the craft hemp retail permit of a person who fails to pay
a civil penalty imposed by the commission.
(b) Before enforcing the imposition of a civil penalty or
suspending or revoking a craft hemp retail permit under this
chapter, the commission shall provide written notice of the alleged
violation to the permit holder and conduct a hearing. The
commission shall provide written notice of the civil penalty or
suspension or revocation of a permit to the permit holder.
(c) Subject to subsection (b), the commission shall revoke the
craft hemp retail permit of a person upon a finding by a
preponderance of the evidence that the person:
(1) has violated IC 7.1-8-5-2 or IC 7.1-8-8-2;
(2) has committed habitual furnishing of craft hemp to a
minor as established under IC 7.1-8-8-2(g); or
(3) has committed habitual illegal entrance by a minor as
established under IC 35-46-1-11.7(f).
Sec. 9. (a) If a craft hemp retail permit has:
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(1) expired; or
(2) been suspended;
the commission may not reinstate or renew the permit until all civil
penalties imposed against the permit holder for violating
IC 7.1-8-5-2, IC 7.1-8-8-2, or IC 35-46-1-11.7 have been paid.
(b) The failure to pay a civil penalty described in subsection (a)
is a Class B infraction.
(c) If a craft hemp retail permit has been revoked, the
commission may not reinstate or renew the permit for at least one
hundred eighty (180) days after the date of revocation. The
commission may reinstate or renew the permit only upon a
reasonable showing by the applicant that the applicant shall:
(1) exercise due diligence in the sale of craft hemp on the
applicant's premises where the craft hemp is sold or
distributed; and
(2) properly supervise and train the applicant's employees or
agents in the handling and sale of craft hemp.
If a permit is reinstated or renewed, the applicant of the permit
shall pay an application fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000).
Sec. 10. The commission may mitigate civil penalties imposed
against a craft hemp retail permit holder for violating IC 7.1-8-5-2,
IC 7.1-8-8-2, IC 35-46-1-11.7, or any of the provisions of this
chapter if the permit holder provides a training program for the
permit holder's employees that includes at least the following
topics:
(1) Laws governing the sale of craft hemp.
(2) Methods of recognizing and handling customers who are
less than twenty-one (21) years of age.
(3) Procedures for proper examination of identification cards
to verify that customers are less than twenty-one (21) years of
age.
Sec. 11. A craft hemp retail permit holder shall exercise due
diligence in the supervision and training of the permit holder's
employees or agents in the handling and sale of craft hemp on the
permit holder's retail premises.
Sec. 12. (a) An employee of a craft hemp retail permit holder
must hold a valid:
(1) driver's license issued by the state of Indiana or another
state; or
(2) identification card issued by the state of Indiana, another
state, or the United States;
to sell craft hemp.
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(b) An employee must have the employee's driver's license or
identification card or a copy of the employee's driver's license or
identification card:
(1) either:
(A) in the employee's possession; or
(B) on file with the employee's employer; and
(2) upon request, readily available to show to an excise officer
or law enforcement officer;
when selling craft hemp.
(c) If an employee holds a valid license or identification card as
described in subsection (a) but is unable to show the license,
identification card, or a copy to an excise officer or law
enforcement officer under subsection (b) because:
(1) the employee has left the license, identification card, or
copy in another location; or
(2) the license, identification card, or copy has otherwise been
lost or mislaid;
the employee may, within five (5) days of the employee's inability
to show the license, identification card, or copy to the excise officer
or law enforcement officer, produce to the excise officer or law
enforcement officer or to the office of the commission satisfactory
evidence of a license or identification card issued to the employee
that was valid at the time the employee was unable to show the
license, identification card, or copy.
(d) If an employee who is unable to show a license, identification
card, or copy to an excise officer or law enforcement officer fails
to produce satisfactory evidence within five (5) days in the manner
described in subsection (c), the commission may impose a civil
penalty on the permit holder.
Sec. 13. (a) If a craft hemp retail permit holder fails to attend or
participate in a hearing without good cause, the hearing judge may
recommend to the commission that the commission suspend or
revoke the permit holder's permit or impose a fine on the permit
holder of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(b) A hearing judge may grant a continuance of a hearing upon
written motion showing good cause for the continuance.
Sec. 14. If a craft hemp retail permit holder sells or distributes
craft hemp at a location:
(1) determined to be a public nuisance; or
(2) at which conduct or acts that are crimes or infractions
under IC 35 occur;
the commission may impose sanctions against the permit holder.
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


Sec. 15. This section applies to a person holding a tobacco sales
certificate. A person holding a tobacco sales certificate may not be
issued a craft hemp retail permit if the person has received a
violation within the previous three (3) years for any of the
following:
(1) Violating IC 7.1-3-18.5-11 (public nuisance).
(2) Habitual illegal sale of tobacco to a person less than
twenty-one (21) years of age (IC 35-46-1-10.2).
(3) Allowing a minor to enter a licensed premises
(IC 35-46-1-11.7).
(4) Selling tobacco, an e-liquid, or an electronic cigarette
containing vitamin E acetate (IC 35-46-1-11.9).
(5) Dealing in paraphernalia (IC 35-48-4-8.5).
Sec. 16. (a) A retail location may not sell craft hemp if the retail
location is within one thousand (1,000) feet of a private school,
public school, or charter school that includes any grade from
kindergarten through grade 12.
(b) If a retailer provides the commission with documentation
that establishes that craft hemp was offered for sale at a retail
location before January 1, 2026, the retail location may sell craft
hemp even if it is within one thousand (1,000) feet of a school.
Chapter 3. Craft Hemp Distributor Permits
Sec. 1. (a) A person may not distribute craft hemp to a retailer
without a valid craft hemp distributor permit issued by the
commission. A craft hemp distributor permit holder may sell craft
hemp to a craft hemp retail permit holder.
(b) A craft hemp distributor permit does not authorize a person
to sell craft hemp products directly to a consumer.
(c) A craft hemp distributor permit holder must purchase craft
hemp from a craft hemp manufacturer permit holder or from an
out-of-state craft hemp supplier permit holder.
(d) A craft hemp distributor permit may be issued only to a
person who owns or operates premises consisting of a permanent
building or structure from which the craft hemp is distributed.
Sec. 1.5. (a) A person located outside of Indiana may not
distribute craft hemp to a person located within Indiana without
a valid out-of-state craft hemp supplier permit issued by the
commission under subsection (b).
(b) The commission may issue an out-of-state craft hemp
supplier permit based on the factors set forth in section 2 of this
chapter.
(c) An out-of-state craft hemp supplier permit holder may sell
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


craft hemp directly to a consumer if the consumer is at least
twenty-one (21) years of age and located within Indiana at the time
of the sale and delivery.
(d) A parcel in which craft hemp is mailed to an Indiana
purchaser must be marked as follows: "CONTAINS CRAFT
HEMP. NOT FOR DELIVERY TO A PERSON UNDER THE
AGE OF 21.".
Sec. 2. (a) A person who desires a craft hemp distributor permit
under this chapter must provide the following to the commission:
(1) The applicant's name and mailing address and the address
of the premises for which the permit is being issued.
(2) A fee of five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(3) The name under which the applicant transacts or intends
to transact business.
(4) The address of the applicant's principal place of business
or headquarters, if any.
(5) The statement required under section 4 of this chapter.
(6) If the applicant is applying for a new permit under section
6 of this chapter, a copy of each of the following:
(A) If the new ownership of the business is a business
entity, the articles of incorporation, articles of
organization, or any other formation documents of the
business entity.
(B) If the new ownership of the business is an individual,
either:
(i) the sales or purchase agreement; or
(ii) an affidavit signed by the applicant concerning the
sale or purchase, on a form prescribed by the
commission, that includes the name and address of the
seller and purchaser.
(C) The permit held by the previous ownership of the
business.
(b) A separate craft hemp distributor permit is required for
each location from which the craft hemp is distributed.
(c) A craft hemp distributor permit holder shall conspicuously
display the holder's permit on the holder's premises where the
craft hemp is distributed, and in any vehicle used for the
transportation of craft hemp.
(d) Any intentional misstatement or suppression of a material
fact in an application filed under this section constitutes grounds
for denial of the craft hemp distributor permit.
(e) A craft hemp distributor permit may be issued only to a
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


person who meets the following requirements:
(1) If the person is an individual, the person must be at least
twenty-one (21) years of age.
(2) The person must be authorized to do business in Indiana.
(3) The person has not had an interest in a permit revoked by
the commission for that business location within the preceding
one (1) year.
(f) The fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the
enforcement and administration fund under IC 7.1-4-10.
Sec. 3. (a) Subject to available resources, the commission shall
not issue a craft hemp distributor permit, except as otherwise
authorized in this title and subject to the other restrictions
contained in this title, to the following persons:
(1) A person who does not have lawful status (as defined in
IC 9-13-2-92.3).
(2) A person who has been convicted within five (5) years
before the date of application of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1)
year;
(B) a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony;
or
(C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty
equal to the penalty for an Indiana Level 1, Level 2, Level
3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony.
However, this subdivision does not apply to a conviction that
has been expunged under IC 35-38-9.
(3) A person who does not meet at least one (1) of the
following descriptions:
(A) The person owns the premises to which the permit will
be applicable.
(B) The person has a valid lease on the premises:
(i) at the time of the application for a permit; and
(ii) for the duration of the period in which the person
sells or distributes in the manner described in section 1
of this chapter.
(C) The person has a franchise agreement with a
franchisor:
(i) that owns the premises to which the permit will be
applicable; or
(ii) that has a bona fide lease on the premises for the full
period for which the permit is to be issued.
(4) A person whose place of business is conducted by a
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


manager or agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the
same qualifications required for the issuance of a craft hemp
distributor permit to the person.
(5) A minor.
(6) A person non compos mentis.
(7) A person who has held a permit under this article or a
permit under this title and who has had that permit under this
article or this title, as applicable, revoked within one (1) year
prior to the date of application for a craft hemp distributor
permit.
(8) A person who has made an application for a permit under
this article or a permit of any type under this title that has
been denied less than one (1) year prior to the person's
application for a craft hemp distributor permit unless the first
application was denied by reason of a procedural or technical
defect.
(b) Subsection (a)(5) does not prevent a minor from being a
stockholder in a corporation.
Sec. 4. An application for a craft hemp distributor permit must
contain the express statement of the applicant that the applicant
consents for the duration of the permit term (if the commission
issues the permit to the applicant) to the entrance, inspection, and
search by an enforcement officer, without a warrant or other
process, of the applicant's premises to determine whether the
applicant is complying with the provisions of this title. The consent
required by this section is renewed and continued by the retention
of a permit or the permit's use by the applicant or the applicant's
agents.
Sec. 5. (a) A craft hemp distributor permit issued by the
commission under this chapter must contain the following
information:
(1) The permit number.
(2) The permit holder's name.
(3) The permanent location of the business for which the
permit is issued.
(4) The expiration date of the permit.
(b) A craft hemp distributor permit is:
(1) valid for two (2) years after the date of issuance, unless the
commission suspends the permit; and
(2) nontransferable.
(c) A craft hemp distributor permit may be renewed. The fee for
renewing a permit is five thousand dollars ($5,000).
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


Sec. 6. If the majority of the ownership of a business that is a
craft hemp distributor permit holder is sold or transferred:
(1) the new ownership of the business must apply for a new
permit under section 2 of this chapter; and
(2) the permit and the permit number held by the previous
ownership of the business are void ninety (90) days after the
date of the sale or transfer of the ownership of the business.
Sec. 7. The commission may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
establish procedures for the issuance, renewal, and reinstatement
of a craft hemp distributor permit.
Sec. 8. (a) Subject to subsection (b), the commission may
suspend the craft hemp distributor permit of a person who fails to
pay a civil penalty imposed by the commission.
(b) Before enforcing the imposition of a civil penalty or
suspending or revoking a craft hemp distributor permit under this
chapter, the commission shall provide written notice of the alleged
violation to the permit holder and conduct a hearing. The
commission shall provide written notice of the civil penalty or
suspension or revocation of a permit to the permit holder.
(c) Subject to subsection (b), the commission shall revoke the
craft hemp distributor permit of a person upon a finding by a
preponderance of the evidence that the person:
(1) has violated IC 7.1-8-5-2 or IC 7.1-8-8-2;
(2) has committed habitual furnishing of craft hemp to a
minor as established under IC 7.1-8-8-2(g); or
(3) has committed habitual illegal entrance by a minor as
established under IC 35-46-1-11.7(f).
Sec. 9. (a) If a craft hemp distributor permit has:
(1) expired; or
(2) been suspended;
the commission may not reinstate or renew the permit until all civil
penalties imposed against the permit holder for violating
IC 7.1-8-5-2, IC 7.1-8-8-2, or IC 35-46-1-11.7 have been paid.
(b) The failure to pay a civil penalty described in subsection (a)
is a Class B infraction.
(c) If a craft hemp distributor permit has been revoked, the
commission may not reinstate or renew the permit for at least one
hundred eighty (180) days after the date of revocation. The
commission may reinstate or renew the permit only upon a
reasonable showing by the applicant that the applicant shall:
(1) exercise due diligence in the distribution of craft hemp;
and
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(2) properly supervise and train the applicant's employees or
agents in the handling and distribution of craft hemp.
If a permit is reinstated or renewed, the applicant of the permit
shall pay an application fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000).
Sec. 10. The commission may mitigate civil penalties imposed
against a craft hemp distributor permit holder for violating
IC 7.1-8-5-2, IC 7.1-8-8-2, IC 35-46-1-11.7, or any of the provisions
of this chapter if the permit holder provides a training program for
the permit holder's employees that includes training in laws
governing the distribution of craft hemp.
Sec. 11. A craft hemp distributor permit holder shall exercise
due diligence in the supervision and training of the permit holder's
employees or agents in the handling and distribution of craft hemp.
Sec. 12. (a) An employee of a craft hemp distributor permit
holder must hold a valid:
(1) driver's license issued by the state of Indiana or another
state; or
(2) identification card issued by the state of Indiana, another
state, or the United States;
to distribute craft hemp.
(b) An employee must have the employee's driver's license or
identification card or a copy of the employee's driver's license or
identification card:
(1) either:
(A) in the employee's possession; or
(B) on file with the employee's employer; and
(2) upon request, readily available to show to an excise officer
or law enforcement officer;
when distributing craft hemp.
(c) If an employee holds a valid license or identification card as
described in subsection (a) but is unable to show the license,
identification card, or a copy to an excise officer or law
enforcement officer under subsection (b) because:
(1) the employee has left the license, identification card, or
copy in another location; or
(2) the license, identification card, or copy has otherwise been
lost or mislaid;
the employee may, within five (5) days of the employee's inability
to show the license, identification card, or copy to the excise officer
or law enforcement officer, produce to the excise officer or law
enforcement officer or to the office of the commission satisfactory
evidence of a license or identification card issued to the employee
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


that was valid at the time the employee was unable to show the
license, identification card, or copy.
(d) If an employee who is unable to show a license, identification
card, or copy to an excise officer or law enforcement officer fails
to produce satisfactory evidence within five (5) days in the manner
described in subsection (c), the commission may impose a civil
penalty on the permit holder.
Sec. 13. (a) If a craft hemp distributor permit holder fails to
attend or participate in a hearing without good cause, the hearing
judge may recommend to the commission that the commission
suspend or revoke the permit holder's permit or impose a fine on
the permit holder of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(b) A hearing judge may grant a continuance of a hearing upon
written motion showing good cause for the continuance.
Sec. 14. If a craft hemp distributor permit holder distributes
craft hemp at a location:
(1) determined to be a public nuisance; or
(2) at which conduct or acts that are crimes or infractions
under IC 35 occur;
the commission may impose sanctions against the permit holder.
Chapter 4. Craft Hemp Manufacturer Permits
Sec. 1. (a) A person may not manufacture craft hemp without a
valid craft hemp manufacturer permit issued by the commission.
(b) A craft hemp manufacturer permit may be issued only to a
person who owns or operates premises consisting of a permanent
building or structure where the craft hemp is manufactured.
(c) A craft hemp manufacturer permit holder may only sell craft
hemp to a craft hemp distributor permit holder or a craft hemp
retail permit holder. A craft hemp manufacturer permit holder
may not sell craft hemp directly to a consumer without first
obtaining a craft hemp retail permit issued by the commission.
Sec. 2. (a) A person who desires a craft hemp manufacturer
permit under this chapter must provide the following to the
commission:
(1) The applicant's name and mailing address and the address
of the premises for which the permit is being issued.
(2) A fee of five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(3) The name under which the applicant transacts or intends
to transact business.
(4) The address of the applicant's principal place of business
or headquarters, if any.
(5) The statement required under section 4 of this chapter.
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(6) If the applicant is applying for a new permit under section
6 of this chapter, a copy of each of the following:
(A) If the new ownership of the business is a business
entity, the articles of incorporation, articles of
organization, or any other formation documents of the
business entity.
(B) If the new ownership of the business is an individual,
either:
(i) the sales or purchase agreement; or
(ii) an affidavit signed by the applicant concerning the
sale or purchase, on a form prescribed by the
commission, that includes the name and address of the
seller and purchaser.
(C) The permit held by the previous ownership of the
business.
(b) A separate craft hemp manufacturer permit is required for
each location where the craft hemp is manufactured.
(c) A craft hemp manufacturer permit holder shall
conspicuously display the holder's permit on the holder's premises
where the craft hemp is manufactured.
(d) Any intentional misstatement or suppression of a material
fact in an application filed under this section constitutes grounds
for denial of the craft hemp manufacturer permit.
(e) A craft hemp manufacturer permit may be issued only to a
person who meets the following requirements:
(1) If the person is an individual, the person must be at least
twenty-one (21) years of age.
(2) The person must be authorized to do business in Indiana.
(3) The person has not had an interest in a permit revoked by
the commission for that business location within the preceding
one (1) year.
(f) The fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the
enforcement and administration fund under IC 7.1-4-10.
Sec. 3. (a) Subject to available resources, the commission shall
not issue a craft hemp manufacturer permit, except as otherwise
authorized in this title and subject to the other restrictions
contained in this title, to the following persons:
(1) A person who does not have lawful status (as defined in
IC 9-13-2-92.3).
(2) A person who has been convicted within five (5) years
before the date of application of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1)
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


year;
(B) a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony;
or
(C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty
equal to the penalty for an Indiana Level 1, Level 2, Level
3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony.
However, this subdivision does not apply to a conviction that
has been expunged under IC 35-38-9.
(3) A person who does not meet at least one (1) of the
following descriptions:
(A) The person owns the premises to which the permit will
be applicable.
(B) The person has a valid lease on the premises:
(i) at the time of the application for a permit; and
(ii) for the duration of the period in which the person
manufactures in the manner described in section 1 of this
chapter.
(C) The person has a franchise agreement with a
franchisor:
(i) that owns the premises to which the permit will be
applicable; or
(ii) that has a bona fide lease on the premises for the full
period for which the permit is to be issued.
(4) A person whose place of business is conducted by a
manager or agent, unless the manager or agent possesses the
same qualifications required for the issuance of a craft hemp
manufacturer permit to the person.
(5) A minor.
(6) A person non compos mentis.
(7) A person who has held a permit under this article or a
permit under this title and who has had that permit under this
article or this title, as applicable, revoked within one (1) year
prior to the date of application for a craft hemp manufacturer
permit.
(8) A person who has made an application for a permit under
this article or a permit of any type under this title that has
been denied less than one (1) year prior to the person's
application for a craft hemp manufacturer permit unless the
first application was denied by reason of a procedural or
technical defect.
(b) Subsection (a)(5) does not prevent a minor from being a
stockholder in a corporation.
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


Sec. 4. An application for a craft hemp manufacturer permit
must contain the express statement of the applicant that the
applicant consents for the duration of the permit term (if the
commission issues the permit to the applicant) to the entrance,
inspection, and search by an enforcement officer, without a
warrant or other process, of the applicant's premises to determine
whether the applicant is complying with the provisions of this title.
The consent required by this section is renewed and continued by
the retention of a permit or the permit's use by the applicant or the
applicant's agents.
Sec. 5. (a) A craft hemp manufacturer permit issued by the
commission under this chapter must contain the following
information:
(1) The permit number.
(2) The permit holder's name.
(3) The permanent location of the business for which the
permit is issued.
(4) The expiration date of the permit.
(b) A craft hemp manufacturer permit is:
(1) valid for two (2) years after the date of issuance, unless the
commission suspends the permit; and
(2) nontransferable.
(c) A craft hemp manufacturer permit may be renewed. The fee
for renewing a permit is five thousand dollars ($5,000).
Sec. 6. If the majority of the ownership of a business that is a
craft hemp manufacturer permit holder is sold or transferred:
(1) the new ownership of the business must apply for a new
permit under section 2 of this chapter; and
(2) the permit and the permit number held by the previous
ownership of the business are void ninety (90) days after the
date of the sale or transfer of the ownership of the business.
Sec. 7. The commission may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
establish procedures for the issuance, renewal, and reinstatement
of a craft hemp manufacturer permit.
Sec. 8. (a) Subject to subsection (b), the commission may
suspend the craft hemp manufacturer permit of a person who fails
to pay a civil penalty imposed by the commission.
(b) Before enforcing the imposition of a civil penalty or
suspending or revoking a craft hemp manufacturer permit under
this chapter, the commission shall provide written notice of the
alleged violation to the permit holder and conduct a hearing. The
commission shall provide written notice of the civil penalty or
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


suspension or revocation of a permit to the permit holder.
(c) Subject to subsection (b), the commission shall revoke the
craft hemp manufacturer permit of a person upon a finding by a
preponderance of the evidence that the person:
(1) has violated IC 7.1-8-5-2 or IC 7.1-8-8-2;
(2) has committed habitual furnishing of craft hemp to a
minor as established under IC 7.1-8-8-2(g); or
(3) has committed habitual illegal entrance by a minor as
established under IC 35-46-1-11.7(f).
Sec. 9. (a) If a craft hemp manufacturer permit has:
(1) expired; or
(2) been suspended;
the commission may not reinstate or renew the permit until all civil
penalties imposed against the permit holder for violating
IC 7.1-8-5-2, IC 7.1-8-8-2, or IC 35-46-1-11.7 have been paid.
(b) The failure to pay a civil penalty described in subsection (a)
is a Class B infraction.
(c) If a craft hemp manufacturer permit has been revoked, the
commission may not reinstate or renew the permit for at least one
hundred eighty (180) days after the date of revocation. The
commission may reinstate or renew the permit only upon a
reasonable showing by the applicant that the applicant shall:
(1) exercise due diligence in the manufacturing of craft hemp;
and
(2) properly supervise and train the applicant's employees or
agents in the handling and manufacturing of craft hemp.
If a permit is reinstated or renewed, the applicant of the permit
shall pay an application fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000).
Sec. 10. The commission may mitigate civil penalties imposed
against a craft hemp manufacturer permit holder for violating
IC 7.1-8-5-2, IC 7.1-8-8-2, IC 35-46-1-11.7, or any of the provisions
of this chapter if the permit holder provides a training program for
the permit holder's employees that includes training in laws
governing the manufacturing of craft hemp.
Sec. 11. A craft hemp manufacturer permit holder shall exercise
due diligence in the supervision and training of the permit holder's
employees or agents in the handling and manufacturing of craft
hemp.
Sec. 12. (a) An employee of a craft hemp manufacturer permit
holder must hold a valid:
(1) driver's license issued by the state of Indiana or another
state; or
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(2) identification card issued by the state of Indiana, another
state, or the United States;
to manufacture craft hemp.
(b) An employee must have the employee's driver's license or
identification card or a copy of the employee's driver's license or
identification card:
(1) either:
(A) in the employee's possession; or
(B) on file with the employee's employer; and
(2) upon request, readily available to show to an excise officer
or law enforcement officer;
when manufacturing craft hemp.
(c) If an employee holds a valid license or identification card as
described in subsection (a) but is unable to show the license,
identification card, or a copy to an excise officer or law
enforcement officer under subsection (b) because:
(1) the employee has left the license, identification card, or
copy in another location; or
(2) the license, identification card, or copy has otherwise been
lost or mislaid;
the employee may, within five (5) days of the employee's inability
to show the license, identification card, or copy to the excise officer
or law enforcement officer, produce to the excise officer or law
enforcement officer or to the office of the commission satisfactory
evidence of a license or identification card issued to the employee
that was valid at the time the employee was unable to show the
license, identification card, or copy.
(d) If an employee who is unable to show a license, identification
card, or copy to an excise officer or law enforcement officer fails
to produce satisfactory evidence within five (5) days in the manner
described in subsection (c), the commission may impose a civil
penalty on the permit holder.
Sec. 13. (a) If a craft hemp manufacturer permit holder fails to
attend or participate in a hearing without good cause, the hearing
judge may recommend to the commission that the commission
suspend or revoke the permit holder's permit or impose a fine on
the permit holder of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(b) A hearing judge may grant a continuance of a hearing upon
written motion showing good cause for the continuance.
Sec. 14. If a craft hemp manufacturer permit holder
manufactures craft hemp at a location:
(1) determined to be a public nuisance; or
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(2) at which conduct or acts that are crimes or infractions
under IC 35 occur;
the commission may impose sanctions against the permit holder.
Chapter 5. Retail Establishments
Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a craft hemp
retail establishment must keep the craft hemp behind a bar or in
a location to which a purchaser does not have access. If a person
purchases craft hemp, an employee of the craft hemp retail
establishment shall remove the craft hemp from behind the bar or
from the inaccessible location and deliver it to the purchaser.
(b) This section does not apply to the holder of a liquor dealer's
permit issued under IC 7.1-3-10-4 that is also a craft hemp retail
establishment.
Sec. 2. (a) A craft hemp retail establishment may not permit
consumption of craft hemp on the premises of the retail
establishment.
(b) This section does not apply to the service of beverages that
contain craft hemp by the following holders of any beer, liquor, or
wine retailer's permits issued under this title:
(1) A racetrack.
(2) A restaurant.
(3) A social club.
(4) A fraternal club.
(5) A resort hotel.
(6) An economic redevelopment site.
(7) A gaming center.
(8) An airport.
(9) A horse track.
(10) The state fairgrounds.
(11) A catering hall.
(12) A historic district.
(13) A professional sports stadium.
(14) A concert venue.
(15) A permit premises within a municipal riverfront
development project.
Chapter 6. Manufacturing Facilities
Sec. 1. (a) A craft hemp manufacturer must submit any
proposed craft hemp packaging to the commission for preapproval
before delivering or causing delivery of craft hemp to a craft hemp
retail establishment.
(b) If the commission does not issue a denial under subsection
(a) within thirty (30) days, the packaging is deemed approved and
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


eligible for sale.
Chapter 7. Advertising
Sec. 1. (a) The commission shall have the power to regulate and
prohibit advertising, signs, displays, posters, and designs intended
to advertise craft hemp or the place where craft hemp is sold.
(b) The commission shall not exercise the prohibition power
contained in subsection (a) for any advertisement appearing in a
newspaper which:
(1) is published at least once a week;
(2) regularly publishes information of current news interest
to the community; and
(3) circulates generally to the public in any part of Indiana,
regardless of where printed.
However, a newspaper shall not include publications devoted to
special interests such as labor, religious, fraternal, society, or trade
publications or journals or publications owned or issued by
political organizations or parties.
(c) The commission shall not exercise the prohibition power
contained in subsection (a) for any advertisement broadcast over
duly licensed radio and television stations.
(d) All advertisements relating to craft hemp, whether published
in a newspaper or broadcast over radio or television, shall conform
to the rules and regulations of the commission.
(e) The commission shall not exercise the prohibition power
contained in subsection (a) for advertising in the official program
of the Indianapolis 500 Race or the Madison Regatta, Inc.,
Hydroplane Race.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may not
prohibit the use of an illuminated sign advertising craft hemp by
brand name that is displayed within the interior or on the exterior
of a premises covered by a craft hemp retail permit, regardless of
whether the sign is illuminated constantly or intermittently.
However, it is unlawful for a craft hemp distributor permit holder
to sell, give, supply, furnish, or grant to, or maintain for, a craft
hemp retail permit holder, an illuminated advertising sign in a
manner that violates the trade practice restrictions of the
commission or this title. It is unlawful for a craft hemp retail
permit holder to receive, accept, display, or permit to be displayed,
an illuminated advertising sign sold, given, supplied, furnished,
granted, or maintained in violation of this subsection. Unless
otherwise stated, when a recipient receives an illuminated
advertising sign, the illuminated advertising sign becomes the
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


property and responsibility of the recipient.
(g) The commission may not prohibit the advertisement of:
(1) craft hemp; or
(2) a place where craft hemp may be obtained;
in a program, scorecard, handbill, throw-away newspaper, or
menu. However, those advertisements must conform to the rules of
the commission.
(h) The commission shall prohibit a craft hemp retail permit
holder from making:
(1) a false advertisement;
(2) a misleading advertisement;
(3) a deceptive statement in an advertisement;
(4) an unsubstantiated health claim about a product that is
not consistent with the product's labeling; or
(5) a statement that disparages a competitor.
(i) The commission shall prohibit a craft hemp retail permit
holder from placing a physical advertisement within five hundred
(500) feet of:
(1) a school;
(2) a playground;
(3) a church; and
(4) other locations that the commission determines could
contain minors.
Sec. 2. A craft hemp retail permit holder's outdoor signage must
comply with any applicable local ordinances or regulations relating
to signs.
Sec. 3. (a) A craft hemp retail permit holder that maintains a
web page must require an individual to affirmatively indicate that
the individual is at least twenty-one (21) years of age before
accessing the content of the web page.
(b) The social media account of a craft hemp retail permit
holder that advertises craft hemp must contain a clearly visible
notice on the main page stating that only individuals at least
twenty-one (21) years of age may follow the account.
(c) A craft hemp retail permit holder may only send electronic
mail advertising its business if the recipient has affirmatively
opted-in to receive electronic mail from the permit holder.
(d) A craft hemp retail permit holder that uses a QR code in an
electronic advertisement must require an individual to
affirmatively indicate that the individual is at least twenty-one (21)
years of age before accessing the content of the site accessed by the
QR code.
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


Sec. 4. A craft hemp retail permit holder may not do any of the
following:
(1) Use items such as toys or inflatables, movie or cartoon
characters, or any other depiction or image likely to be
appealing to children, if the item, image, or depiction suggests
an intent to cause children to become interested in the
purchase or consumption of craft hemp.
(2) Use or employ a commercial mascot outside of, and in
proximity to, a permitted business.
Chapter 8. Criminal Acts
Sec. 1. (a) This section does not apply to a person who holds a
permit to sell, distribute, or manufacture craft hemp.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally:
(1) purchases;
(2) receives;
(3) manufactures;
(4) imports;
(5) transports;
(6) causes to be imported or transports from another state,
territory, or country, into Indiana;
(7) ships;
(8) barters;
(9) gives away;
(10) exchanges;
(11) furnishes;
(12) handles; or
(13) possesses;
craft hemp or a product containing THC (tetrahydrocannabinol)
for purposes of sale, commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(c) An individual who knowingly or intentionally acquires craft
hemp from a person that the individual knows does not hold an
appropriate permit under this article to sell, distribute,
manufacture, or give craft hemp commits a Class B misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. (a) A person who recklessly, knowingly, or intentionally
sells, barters, exchanges, provides, or furnishes:
(1) craft hemp; or
(2) a product containing THC (tetrahydrocannabinol);
to a minor commits dealing craft hemp to a minor, a Class A
misdemeanor.
(b) An offense described in subsection (a) is a:
(1) Level 6 felony if the person has a prior unrelated
conviction under this section; or
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(2) Level 5 felony if the consumption, ingestion, or use of the
craft hemp or product containing THC
(tetrahydrocannabinol) is the proximate cause of serious
bodily injury to or the death of an individual.
(c) The following defenses are available to a person or permit
holder accused of dealing craft hemp to a minor:
(1) The buyer or recipient produced a driver's license that
included the purchaser's or recipient's photograph and
indicated the purchaser or recipient is at least twenty-one (21)
years of age to make the purchase.
(2) The buyer or recipient produced a photographic
identification card issued under IC 9-24-16-1 or a similar card
issued under the laws of another state or the federal
government that indicated the purchaser or recipient was at
least twenty-one (21) years of age to make the purchase.
(3) An ordinary, prudent individual would believe the
purchaser or recipient was not less than forty (40) years of
age based on the purchaser's or recipient's appearance.
(d) It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that a
permit holder sold or provided craft hemp to a minor who acted in
the ordinary course of employment or a business concerning craft
hemp for the following activities:
(1) Agriculture.
(2) Processing.
(3) Transporting.
(4) Wholesaling.
(5) Retailing.
(e) A person who distributes or sells craft hemp product directly
to purchasers through a website must use a reliable online age
verification system or obtain and examine a copy of the
purchaser's government issued identification.
(f) A permit holder who violates subsection (a) or (e) is subject
to the following civil penalties:
(1) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for the first violation.
(2) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a second violation that
occurs within two (2) years of a first violation and the
suspension of the permit for up to six (6) months.
(3) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each subsequent
violation that occurs within two (2) years of the preceding
violation and the revocation of the permit.
(g) A permit holder who violates subsection (a) at least three (3)
times in a one (1) year period commits habitual furnishing of craft
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


hemp to a minor.
(h) A retailer whose permit is suspended under subsection (f)(2)
may reapply for a permit after one (1) year of the suspension.
Sec. 3. (a) A minor who knowingly or intentionally possesses:
(1) craft hemp; or
(2) a product containing THC (tetrahydrocannabinol);
commits possession of craft hemp by a minor, a Class B
misdemeanor.
(b) It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that the
accused minor acted in the ordinary course of employment or a
business concerning craft hemp for the following activities:
(1) Agriculture.
(2) Processing.
(3) Transporting.
(4) Wholesaling.
(5) Retailing.
Sec. 4. (a) As used in this section, "adulterated craft hemp
flower product" means:
(1) a craft hemp flower product or a purported craft hemp
flower product that contains an ingredient that is illegal under
or prohibited by:
(A) state law;
(B) federal law;
(C) a commission rule; or
(D) a commission regulation;
(2) a craft hemp flower product or a purported craft hemp
flower product for which the commission does not have a
certificate of analysis on file; or
(3) a craft hemp flower product that does not substantially
correspond to its certificate of analysis.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally sells, gives away,
barters, furnishes, exchanges, possesses, or keeps adulterated craft
hemp flower product commits a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 7. IC 9-13-2-86, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 82, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 86. "Intoxicated" means under the influence of:
(1) alcohol;
(2) a controlled substance (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1);
(3) a drug other than alcohol or a controlled substance;
(4) a substance described in IC 35-46-6-2 or IC 35-46-6-3;
(5) a combination of substances described in subdivisions (1)
through (4); or
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(5) craft hemp (as defined in IC 7.1-8-1-2);
(6) any other substance, not including food and food ingredients
(as defined in IC 6-2.5-1-20), tobacco (as defined in
IC 6-2.5-1-28), or a dietary supplement (as defined in
IC 6-2.5-1-16); or
(7) a combination of substances described in this section;
so that there is an impaired condition of thought and action and the loss
of normal control of a person's faculties.
SECTION 8. IC 15-15-13-6.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.7. As used in this chapter,
"work in progress hemp extract" means a compound:
(1) derived from hemp;
(2) intended to be processed into a hemp product;
(3) in a partially processed state;
(4) having a concentration of delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol
that exceeds three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) by dry weight;
and
(5) not marketed for consumer use or consumption.
SECTION 9. IC 15-15-13-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. Only a hemp licensee, the licensee's designee,
or the licensee's agents may be permitted to transport hemp or work in
progress hemp extract off a production site. When transporting hemp
or work in progress hemp extract off the production site, the hemp
licensee, designee, or agent shall have in the licensee's, designee's, or
agent's possession the licensing documents from the state seed
commissioner evidencing that the hemp or work in progress hemp
extract is from certified seed produced by a licensed grower.
SECTION 10. IC 15-15-13-11.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.5. (a) Subject to subsection (b),
a handler holding a valid license under this chapter may possess,
manufacture, store, transport, or sell work in progress hemp
extract.
(b) Work in progress hemp extract may be sold only to a:
(1) handler holding a valid license under this chapter;
(2) person holding a valid hemp or cannabis license in another
jurisdiction; or
(3) craft hemp manufacturer permit holder, as described in
IC 7.1-8-4.
SECTION 11. IC 15-15-13-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


SECTION 105, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) Hemp bud (as defined in
IC 35-48-1.1-23) and hemp flower (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-24)
Craft hemp flower (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-68.8) may be
transported or sold intrastate only to a processor licensed under this
chapter for processing or manufacturing into a legal hemp product,
including a craft hemp flower product (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-68.9).
(b) Craft hemp flower may be sold and transported interstate in
accordance with section 11 of this chapter.
(b) (c) The state seed commissioner may impose a civil penalty
under section 13 of this chapter for a violation of subsection (a).
SECTION 12. IC 16-42-2-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A food is
considered adulterated under any of the following conditions:
(1) If the food bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious
substance that may make the food injurious to health. However,
if the substance is not an added substance, the food is not to be
considered adulterated under this subdivision if the quantity of the
substance in the food does not ordinarily make the food injurious
to health.
(2) If:
(A) the food bears or contains any added poison or added
deleterious substance (other than a poison or a deleterious
substance that is a pesticide chemical in or on a raw
agricultural commodity, a food additive, or a color additive)
that is unsafe within the meaning of section 5 of this chapter;
(B) the food is a raw agricultural commodity and the food
bears or contains a pesticide chemical that is unsafe under
section 5 of this chapter; or
(C) the food is or contains a food additive that is unsafe under
section 5 of this chapter.
However, when a pesticide chemical is used in or on a raw
agricultural commodity in conformity with an exemption granted
or tolerance prescribed under section 5 of this chapter and the raw
agricultural commodity has been subjected to processing such as
canning, cooking, freezing, dehydrating, or milling, the residue of
the pesticide chemical remaining in or on the processed food,
notwithstanding section 5 of this chapter and clause (C) is not
considered unsafe if the residue in or on the raw agricultural
commodity has been removed to the extent possible in good
manufacturing practice, and the concentration of the residues in
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


the processed food, when ready to eat, is not greater than the
tolerance prescribed for the raw agricultural commodity.
(3) If the food consists in whole or in part of a diseased,
contaminated, filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance or if the
food is otherwise unfit for food.
(4) If the food has been produced, transported, handled, prepared,
packed, or held under unsanitary conditions or in unsanitary
containers as the result of which the food may have become
contaminated with filth or made diseased, unwholesome, or
injurious to health.
(5) If the food is, in whole or in part, the product of:
(A) a diseased animal;
(B) an animal that has died otherwise than by slaughter; or
(C) an animal that has been fed upon the uncooked offal from
a slaughterhouse.
(6) If the food's container is composed in whole or in part of any
poisonous or deleterious substance that may make the contents
injurious to health.
(7) If the food has been intentionally subjected to radiation, unless
the use of the radiation was in conformity with a rule or an
exemption in effect under section 5 of this chapter.
(8) If any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part
omitted or abstracted from the food.
(9) If any substance has been substituted wholly or in part.
(10) If damage or inferiority has been concealed in any manner.
(11) If any substance has been added to the food or mixed or
packed with the food to:
(A) increase the food's bulk or weight;
(B) reduce the food's quality or strength;
(C) make the food appear better or of greater value than the
food is; or
(D) create a deceptive appearance.
(12) If the food bears or contains a coal-tar color other than one
from a batch that has been certified by the federal Food and Drug
Administrator, as provided by regulations promulgated under
authority of the Federal Act.
(13) If the food is a confectionery and has partially or completely
imbedded embedded in the food any nonnutritive object.
However, this subdivision does not apply in the case of any
nonnutritive object if, in the judgment of the state department as
provided by rules, the nonnutritive object is of practical,
functional value to the confectionery product and would not make
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


the product injurious or hazardous to health.
(14) If the food is a confectionery and bears or contains any
alcohol other than alcohol not in excess of one-half of one percent
(0.5%) by volume derived solely from the use of flavoring
extracts.
(15) If the food is a confectionery and bears or contains any
nonnutritive substance. However, this subdivision does not apply
to a safe, nonnutritive substance if:
(A) the nonnutritive substance is in or on a confectionery for
a practical, functional purpose in the manufacture, packaging,
or storing of the confectionery; and
(B) the use of the substance does not promote deception of the
consumer or otherwise result in adulteration or misbranding in
violation of any provision of IC 16-42-1 through IC 16-42-4.
In addition, the state department may, for the purpose of
avoiding or resolving uncertainty as to the application of this
subdivision, adopt rules allowing or prohibiting the use of
particular nonnutritive substances.
(16) If the food falls below the standard of purity, quality, or
strength that the food purports or is represented to possess.
(17) If the food is or bears or contains any color additive that is
unsafe under section 5 of this chapter.
(b) Subsection (a)(8) and (a)(9) do not prohibit:
(1) the removal of butterfat from; or
(2) the addition of skim milk to;
dairy products that comply with the definitions and standards for dairy
products adopted by the state department.
(c) A food is not considered adulterated for containing low THC
hemp extract (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-27) or craft hemp flower
(as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-68.8).
SECTION 13. IC 24-4-21-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. A person may distribute low THC hemp extract
in Indiana only if the distributor has a certificate of analysis prepared
by an independent testing laboratory showing:
(1) that the low THC hemp extract is the product of a batch tested
by the independent testing laboratory;
(2) that the independent testing laboratory determined that the
batch contained not more than three-tenths percent (0.3%) total
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including precursors, by
weight or volume, based on the testing of a random sample of the
batch; and
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(3) the cannabidiol percent present of the low THC hemp extract.
SECTION 14. IC 24-4-21-4, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), low
THC hemp extract must be distributed in packaging that contains the
following information:
(1) A scannable bar code or QR code linked to a document that
contains information with respect to the manufacture of the low
THC hemp extract, including the:
(A) batch identification number;
(B) product name;
(C) batch date;
(D) expiration date, which must be not more than two (2) years
from the date of manufacture;
(E) batch size;
(F) total quantity produced;
(G) ingredients used, including the:
(i) ingredient name;
(ii) name of the company that manufactured the ingredient;
(iii) company or product identification number or code, if
applicable; and
(iv) ingredient lot number; and
(H) download link for a certificate of analysis for the low THC
hemp extract.
(2) The batch number.
(3) The Internet address of a web site website to obtain batch
information.
(4) The expiration date.
(5) The number of milligrams of low THC hemp extract.
(6) The manufacturer.
(7) The fact that the product contains not more than three-tenths
of one percent (0.3%) total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC),
including precursors, by weight or volume.
(b) Before July 1, 2018, low THC hemp extract may be distributed
in Indiana without having met the requirements described in subsection
(a).
(b) After June 30, 2026, the packaging of low THC hemp extract
may not:
(1) contain any statement, artwork, or design that could
reasonably mislead any person to believe that the package
contains anything other than low THC hemp extract; or
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(2) bear an unauthorized trademark, trade name, famous
mark, or other identifying mark, imprint, or device, or any
likeness thereof.
SECTION 15. IC 24-4-22-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.153-2018,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), A
person may sell low THC hemp extract at retail only if the packaging
complies with the requirements of IC 24-4-21-4.
(b) Before July 1, 2018, a person may sell low THC hemp extract at
retail even if the packaging does not comply with the requirements of
IC 24-4-21-4.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2026, no low THC hemp extract may be
distributed, sold, or offered for sale at retail or online to a person
who is less than twenty-one (21) years of age.
(c) Any website owned, managed, or operated by a person who
distributes or sells low THC hemp extract directly to consumers
must verify a consumer's age by either using a reliable online age
verification service, or by obtaining and examining a copy of a
government issued identification, prior to completing a purchase.
(d) A person who violates this section is subject to a civil penalty
not to exceed the following:
(1) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a first violation.
(2) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a second violation that
occurs within two (2) years after a first violation, and
suspension of the retail merchant's certificate issued under
IC 6-2.5-8 for up to six (6) months.
(3) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each subsequent
violation that occurs within two (2) years of the preceding
violation, and revocation of the retail merchant's certificate
issued under IC 6-2.5-8, with a one (1) year waiting period for
reapplication.
(e) It is a defense to a violation under this section that the
distributor or seller examined the purchaser's or recipient's
driver's license, or other valid government issued identification,
that positively identified the purchaser or recipient as being at least
twenty-one (21) years of age.
SECTION 16. IC 24-4-24.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 24.9. Distribution of Craft Hemp Flower Products
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "certificate of analysis" means
a certificate from an independent testing laboratory describing the
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


results of the laboratory's testing of a sample.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "craft hemp flower product" has
the meaning set forth in IC 35-31.5-2-68.9.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "independent testing laboratory"
means a laboratory:
(1) with respect to which no person having a direct or indirect
interest in the laboratory also has a direct or indirect interest
in a facility that:
(A) processes, distributes, or sells a craft hemp flower
product, or a substantially similar substance in another
jurisdiction;
(B) cultivates, processes, distributes, dispenses, or sells
marijuana;
(C) cultivates, processes, or distributes hemp; or
(D) processes, distributes, or sells low THC hemp extract
(as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-27); and
(2) that is accredited as a testing laboratory under
International Organization for Standardization (ISO) 17025
by a third party accrediting body such as the American
Association for Laboratory Accreditation (A2LA) or Assured
Calibration and Laboratory Accreditation Select Services
(ACLASS).
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "tamper evident packaging"
means a package having at least one (1) indicator or a barrier to
entry that, if breached or missing, can reasonably be expected to
provide visible evidence to consumers that tampering has occurred.
Sec. 5. (a) Before a person may distribute a craft hemp flower
product, the distributor must have a certificate of analysis
prepared by an independent testing laboratory showing the
following:
(1) That the craft hemp flower product is the product of a
batch tested by the independent testing laboratory.
(2) That the independent testing laboratory determined that
the batch contained not more than three-tenths of one percent
(0.3%) tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), by weight or volume,
based on the testing of a random sample of the batch.
(3) That the batch has been tested for and does not exceed the
acceptable levels set forth under section 7 of this chapter for
the following contaminants:
(A) Heavy metals, including cadmium, lead, arsenic, and
mercury.
(B) Pesticides.
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(C) Herbicides.
(D) Mycotoxins.
(E) Bacterial toxins.
(F) Chemical solvent residues.
(4) The potency of the craft hemp flower product, including
the projected percentage of:
(A) THC;
(B) cannabidiol; and
(C) other cannabinoids in the craft hemp flower product;
by weight or volume.
(b) Each batch of a craft hemp flower product submitted to an
independent testing laboratory under this section must have been
harvested at the same time and cultivated in a contiguous area in
the same field or facility.
Sec. 6. A craft hemp flower product must be distributed in
tamper evident packaging that contains the following information:
(1) A scannable bar code or QR code linked to a document
that contains information with respect to the craft hemp
flower product, including the:
(A) batch identification number;
(B) product name;
(C) batch date;
(D) expiration date, which must be not more than two (2)
years from the date of harvest;
(E) batch size;
(F) total quantity produced;
(G) ingredients used, including the:
(i) ingredient name;
(ii) name of the company that manufactured the
ingredient;
(iii) company or product identification number or code,
if applicable; and
(iv) ingredient lot number; and
(H) download link for a certificate of analysis for the craft
hemp flower product.
(2) The batch identification number.
(3) The address of a website to obtain batch information.
(4) The expiration date, which must be not more than two (2)
years from the date of harvest.
(5) The number of grams of craft hemp flower (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-68.8) contained in the craft hemp flower product.
(6) The facility that produced the craft hemp flower product.
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(7) The fact that the craft hemp flower product contains not
more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%)
tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), by weight or volume.
Sec. 7. A craft hemp flower product may not be distributed if a
certificate of analysis prepared by an independent testing
laboratory shows any of the following:
(1) A concentration of metals that is more than any of the
following:
(A) Four-tenths (0.4) part per million of cadmium.
(B) Five-tenths (0.5) part per million of lead.
(C) Four-tenths (0.4) part per million of arsenic.
(D) Two-tenths (0.2) part per million of mercury.
(2) A concentration of microbiological units that is more than
any of the following:
(A) One (1) colony forming unit per gram of Shiga-Toxin
Escherichia coli.
(B) One (1) colony forming unit per gram of Salmonella
spp.
(C) Ten thousand (10,000) colony forming units of
culturable mold.
(3) A concentration of residual solvents and chemicals that is
more than any of the following:
(A) Five thousand (5,000) parts per million of butane.
(B) Two (2) parts per million of benzene.
(C) Five thousand (5,000) parts per million of heptane.
(D) Two hundred ninety (290) parts per million of hexane.
(E) Eight hundred ninety (890) parts per million of toluene.
(F) One (1) part per million of total xylenes, including
ortho-xylene, meta-xylene, and para-xylene.
Sec. 8. (a) A person who knowingly or intentionally distributes
or sells a craft hemp flower product in violation of this chapter
commits a Class B misdemeanor. However, the offense is a Class
A misdemeanor if the person has a prior unrelated conviction for
a violation of this chapter.
(b) The penalties in this section are in addition to any criminal
penalties that may be imposed for unlawful possession or
distribution of a controlled substance.
SECTION 17. IC 34-30-2.1-72, AS ADDED BY P.L.105-2022,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 72. IC 7.1-5-10-15 (Concerning alcoholic
beverage permittee or permittee's agent refusing to serve alcoholic
beverages or products containing THC (tetrahydrocannabinol) to
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


certain persons).
SECTION 18. IC 34-30-2.1-73, AS ADDED BY P.L.105-2022,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 73. IC 7.1-5-10-15.5 (Concerning persons who
furnish an alcoholic beverage or a product containing THC
(tetrahydrocannabinol) for damages caused by an impaired or
intoxicated person).
SECTION 19. IC 35-31.5-2-68.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 68.8. (a) "Craft hemp flower"
means the harvested reproductive organ, whether immature or
mature, of the Cannabis sativa L. plant containing not more than
three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol
(THC) by weight or volume, in a form that is intended to allow
THC to be introduced into the human body by inhalation of smoke.
(b) The term does not include agricultural hemp seed (as defined
in IC 15-15-13-2).
SECTION 20. IC 35-31.5-2-68.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 68.9. (a) "Craft hemp flower
product" means a substance or product for sale to consumers that:
(1) is derived from or contains any part of craft hemp flower;
(2) contains not more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%)
delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) by weight or volume;
(3) contains no other controlled substances; and
(4) is in the form of:
(A) a gummy that contains not more than one hundred
(100) milligrams of THC, delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol,
delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol, or hexahydrocannabinol
per serving and not more than three thousand (3,000)
milligrams of THC, delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-10
tetrahydrocannabinol, or hexahydrocannabinol per
package;
(B) an edible that contains not more than one hundred
(100) milligrams of THC, delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol,
delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol, or hexahydrocannabinol
per individualized unit and not more than three thousand
(3,000) milligrams of THC, delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol,
delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol, or hexahydrocannabinol
per package;
(C) a drink that contains not more than twenty-five (25)
milligrams of THC, delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-10
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


tetrahydrocannabinol, or hexahydrocannabinol per
individualized unit and not more than three hundred (300)
milligrams of THC, delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-10
tetrahydrocannabinol, or hexahydrocannabinol per
package;
(D) a tincture that contains not more than one hundred
(100) milligrams of THC, delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol,
delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol, or hexahydrocannabinol
per serving and not more than three thousand (3,000)
milligrams of THC, delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-10
tetrahydrocannabinol, or hexahydrocannabinol per
package;
(E) an e-liquid that contains not more than three (3) grams
of THC, delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-10
tetrahydrocannabinol, or hexahydrocannabinol per device;
or
(F) a topical not for human consumption.
The term does not include smokable hemp.
(b) A variance of up to twenty percent (20%) from the
milligram limits described in subsection (a) is permitted to account
for testing variability and manufacturing tolerances.
SECTION 21. IC 35-46-1-11.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.163-2025,
SECTION 66, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.7. (a) A retail establishment in which tobacco
products and craft hemp flower products account for at least
eighty-five percent (85%) of the retail establishment's gross sales may
not allow an individual who is less than twenty-one (21) years of age
to enter the retail establishment.
(b) An individual who is less than twenty-one (21) years of age may
not enter a retail establishment described in subsection (a).
(c) A retail establishment described in subsection (a) must
conspicuously post on all entrances to the retail establishment the
following:
(1) A sign in boldface type that states "NOTICE: It is unlawful for
a person less than 21 years old to enter this store.".
(2) A sign printed in letters and numbers at least one-half (1/2)
inch high that displays a toll free phone number for assistance to
callers in quitting smoking, as determined by the Indiana
department of health.
(d) A person who violates this section commits a Class C infraction.
Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-4(c), a civil judgment for an infraction
committed under this section must be imposed as follows:
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(1) If the person has not been cited for a violation of this section
in the previous one (1) year, a civil penalty of up to four hundred
dollars ($400).
(2) If the person has had one (1) violation in the previous one (1)
year, a civil penalty of up to eight hundred dollars ($800).
(3) If the person has had two (2) violations in the previous one (1)
year, a civil penalty of up to one thousand four hundred dollars
($1,400).
(4) If the person has had three (3) or more violations in the
previous one (1) year, a civil penalty of up to two thousand dollars
($2,000).
A person may not be cited more than once every twenty-four (24)
hours.
(e) Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-5(c), civil penalties collected under
this section must be deposited in the Richard D. Doyle tobacco
education and enforcement fund established under IC 7.1-6-2-6.
(f) A person who violates subsection (a) at least six (6) times in any
one (1) year period commits habitual illegal entrance by a minor, a
Class B infraction.
SECTION 22. IC 35-48-1.1-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. "Controlled substance" means a
drug, substance, or immediate precursor in schedule I, II, III, IV, or V
under:
(1) IC 35-48-2-4, IC 35-48-2-6, IC 35-48-2-8, IC 35-48-2-10, or
IC 35-48-2-12, if IC 35-48-2-14 does not apply; or
(2) a rule adopted by the board, if IC 35-48-2-14 applies.
The term does not include low THC hemp extract or a craft hemp
flower product.
SECTION 23. IC 35-48-1.1-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) "Controlled substance analog"
means a substance that, due to its chemical structure and potential for
abuse or misuse, meets the following criteria:
(1) The substance is substantially similar to a controlled substance
classified under IC 35-48-2.
(2) The substance has a narcotic, stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system or is
represented or intended to have a narcotic, stimulant, depressant,
or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system
substantially similar to or greater than that of a controlled
substance classified under IC 35-48-2.
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(b) The definition set forth in subsection (a) does not include:
(1) a controlled substance;
(2) a legend drug;
(3) a substance for which there is an approved new drug
application;
(4) any compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any
controlled substance, that is not for administration to a human
being or an animal, and that is packaged in a form or
concentration, or with adulterants or denaturants, such that as
packaged it does not present any significant potential for abuse;
(5) a substance to which an investigational exemption applies
under Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act
(chapter 675, 52 Stat. 1052 (21 U.S.C. 355)), but only to the
extent that conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the
exemption; or
(6) low THC hemp extract; or
(7) a craft hemp flower product.
(c) For purposes of subsection (a), "substantially similar", as it
applies to the chemical structure of a substance, means that the
chemical structure of the substance, when compared to the structure of
a controlled substance, has a single difference in the structural formula
that substitutes one (1) atom or functional group for another, including:
(1) one (1) halogen for another halogen;
(2) one (1) hydrogen for a halogen;
(3) one (1) halogen for a hydrogen; or
(4) an alkyl group added or deleted:
(A) as a side chain to or from a molecule; or
(B) from a side chain of a molecule.
SECTION 24. IC 35-48-1.1-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) "Counterfeit substance", for
purposes of IC 35-48-4-5, means a controlled substance which, or the
container or labeling of which, without authorization, bears the
trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, number, or
device, or any likeness thereof, of a manufacturer, distributor, or
dispenser other than the person who in fact manufactured, distributed,
or dispensed the substance.
(b) "Counterfeit substance", for purposes of IC 35-48-4-5.5,
means craft hemp flower or a craft hemp flower product which, or
the container or labeling of which, without authorization, bears the
trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint,
number, or device, or any likeness thereof, of a manufacturer,
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


distributor, or dispenser other than the person who in fact
manufactured, distributed, or dispensed the substance.
SECTION 25. IC 35-48-1.1-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.5. "Craft hemp flower product"
has the meaning set forth in IC 35-31.5-2-68.9.
SECTION 26. IC 35-48-1.1-21, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21. "Hashish" does not include:
(1) low THC hemp extract; or
(2) a craft hemp flower product.
SECTION 27. IC 35-48-1.1-23 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 23. (a) "Hemp bud" means the harvested immature
reproductive organ of the female hemp plant.
(b) The term does not include agricultural hemp seed.
SECTION 28. IC 35-48-1.1-24 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 24. (a) "Hemp flower" means the harvested reproductive
organ, whether immature or mature, of the female hemp plant.
(b) The term does not include agricultural hemp seed.
SECTION 29. IC 35-48-1.1-27, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) "Low THC hemp extract"
means a substance or compound that:
(1) is derived from or contains any part of the plant Cannabis
sativa L. that meets the definition of hemp under IC 15-15-13-6;
(2) contains not more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%)
total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including precursors,
by weight or volume; and
(3) contains no other controlled substances.
(b) The term does not include:
(1) the harvested reproductive organ, whether immature or
mature, of the female hemp plant; or
(2) smokable hemp; or
(3) a craft hemp flower product.
SECTION 30. IC 35-48-1.1-29, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 29. (a) "Marijuana" means any part
of the plant genus Cannabis whether growing or not; the seeds thereof;
the resin extracted from any part of the plant, including hashish and
hash oil; any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin.
(b) The term does not include:
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


(1) the mature stalks of the plant;
(2) fiber produced from the stalks;
(3) oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant;
(4) any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture,
or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted
therefrom);
(5) the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of
germination;
(6) hemp (as defined by IC 15-15-13-6);
(7) low THC hemp extract; or
(8) smokable hemp. a craft hemp flower product.
SECTION 31. IC 35-48-1.1-38, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 38. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), "smokable hemp" means a product, plant, or part of a
plant containing not more than three-tenths percent (0.3%)
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including precursors and
derivatives of THC (tetrahydrocannabinol), in a form that allows
THC to be introduced into the human body by inhalation of smoke.
Except as provided in subsection (b), the term includes craft hemp
flower.
(1) hemp bud; and
(2) hemp flower.
(b) The term does not include a craft hemp flower product (as
defined in IC 35-31.5-2-68.9), or:
(1) a hemp plant that is; or
(2) parts of a hemp plant that are; or
(3) craft hemp flower that is;
grown or handled by a licensee for processing or manufacturing into a
legal hemp product, including a craft hemp flower product.
SECTION 32. IC 35-48-4-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. A person who:
(1) knowingly or intentionally:
(A) creates;
(B) delivers; or
(C) finances the delivery of;
a counterfeit hemp substance; or
(2) possesses, with intent to:
(A) deliver; or
(B) finance the delivery of;
a counterfeit hemp substance;
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106


commits dealing in a counterfeit hemp substance, a Class A
misdemeanor. However, a person may be convicted of an offense
under subdivision (2) only if there is evidence in addition to the
weight of the counterfeit hemp substance that the person intended
to deliver or finance the delivery of the counterfeit hemp substance.
SECTION 33. IC 35-52-7-97.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 97.1. IC 7.1-8-8-1, IC 7.1-8-8-2,
IC 7.1-8-8-3, and IC 7.1-8-8-4 define crimes concerning craft hemp.
SECTION 34. IC 35-52-24-20.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20.4. IC 24-4-24.9-8 defines a
crime concerning distribution or sale of craft hemp flower
products.
2026 IN 1130—LS 6594/DI 106